South Dakota, session 2026, HB1246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-27:
A state agency or political subdivision may not enter into an agreement with a non-
governmental entity, private person, or public-private business concerning the
construction, development, or location of a data center, which requires confidentiality or
nondisclosure. An agreement under this section is a public record as defined in § 1-27-
1.1.
For purposes of this section, "data center" means any facility that is used as a
centralized repository for the dissemination, management, processing, and storage of
electronic data and information.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.